North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-04 Supervision of Issue and Sale of Securities
10-04-07.2.
Registration by coordination.

A security for which a registration statement has been filed under the federal Securities Act of 1933 [15 U.S.C. 77a et seq.] in connection with the same offering may be registered by coordination under this section. Only the issuer of the security or a broker-dealer registered under section 10-04-10 may make an application for registration of securities by coordination.

A registration statement and accompanying records under this section must contain or be accompanied by all of the following records in addition to the information specified in section 10-04-08, a payment of an initial filing fee in the amount as set forth in subsection 2 of section 10-04-08, and a consent to service of process conforming to the requirements of section 10-04-14:

A copy of the latest form of prospectus filed under the federal Securities Act of 1933 [15 U.S.C. 77a et seq.].

A copy of the articles of incorporation and bylaws, or substantial equivalents, currently in effect; a copy of any agreement with or among underwriters; a copy of any indenture or other instrument governing the issuance of the security to be registered; and a specimen, copy, or description of the security that is required by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.

Copies of any other information or any other records filed by the issuer under the federal Securities Act of 1933 [15 U.S.C. 77a et seq.] requested by the commissioner.

An undertaking to forward each amendment to the federal prospectus, other than an amendment that delays the effective date of the registration statement, promptly after filing with the federal securities and exchange commission.

A registration statement under this section becomes effective simultaneously with or subsequent to the federal registration statement if all the following conditions are satisfied.

A stop order under subsection 4 or issued by the federal securities and exchange commission is not in effect and a proceeding is not pending against the issuer under section 10-04-09.

The registration statement has been on file for at least twenty days or a shorter period provided by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.

The registrant promptly shall notify the commissioner in a record of the date the federal registration statement becomes effective and the content of any price amendment and promptly shall file a record containing the price amendment. If the notice is not timely received, the commissioner may issue a stop order, without prior notice or hearing, retroactively denying effectiveness to the registration statement or suspending the registration statement’s effectiveness until compliance with this section. The commissioner promptly shall notify the registrant of an order by sending a copy of the order to the registrant and if the registrant subsequently complies with the notice requirements of this section, the stop order is void as of the date of issuance.

If the federal registration statement becomes effective before each of the conditions in this section is satisfied or is waived by the commissioner, the registration statement is automatically effective under this chapter at the time all the conditions are satisfied or waived. If the registrant notifies the commissioner of the date the federal registration statement is expected to become effective, the commissioner promptly shall notify the registrant and promptly confirm this notice by a record, indicating whether all the conditions are satisfied or waived and whether the commissioner intends the institution of a proceeding under section 10-04-09. The notice by the commissioner does not preclude the institution of such a proceeding.

Registration under this section is effective for a period of one year. A renewal fee of one hundred fifty dollars must be paid for the renewal of the registration of the securities for additional periods of one year.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 89, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

10-04-08.
Registration by qualification.

Securities required to be registered by qualification under this chapter before they may be sold in this state must be registered as provided in this section. Application for registration of securities by qualification must be made by the issuer of the securities or by a registered broker-dealer by filing with the department:

An application for registration, which must be made in writing or on forms prescribed by the commissioner, must contain the following information and be accompanied by the following documents:

With respect to the applicant or issuer and any significant subsidiary:

Its name, address, and form of organization;

The state of foreign jurisdiction and date of its organization;

The general character and location of its business;

A general description of its physical properties and equipment; and

A statement of the general competitive conditions in the industry or business in which it is or will be engaged.

With respect to every director and officer of the issuer, or person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions:

The person’s name, address, and principal occupation for the past five years;

The amount of securities of the issuer held by the person as of a specified date within thirty days of the filing of the application for registration;

The amount of the securities covered by the application for registration to which the person has indicated an intention to subscribe; and

A description of any material interest in any transaction with the issuer or any subsidiary effected within the past three years or proposed to be effected.

With respect to persons covered by subdivision b, the remuneration paid during the past twelve months and estimated to be paid during the next twelve months, directly or indirectly, by the issuer to all those persons in the aggregate.

With respect to any person owning of record, or beneficially if known, ten percent or more of the outstanding shares of any class of equity security of the issuer, the information specified in subdivision b other than the person’s occupation.

With respect to every promoter if the issuer was organized within the past three years, the information specified in subdivision b, any amount paid to the promoter within that period or intended to be paid to the promoter, and the consideration for any such payment.

With respect to any person on whose behalf any part of the offering is to be made in a nonissuer distribution:

The person’s name and address;

The amount of securities of the issuer held by the person as of the date of the filing of the application for registration;

A description of any material interest in any transaction with the issuer or any subsidiary effected within the past three years or proposed to be effected; and

A statement of the person’s reasons for making the offering.

The title, kind, classes, and amount of securities to be offered in this state; the proposed offering price to the public or the method by which it is to be computed; any variation therefrom at which any proportion of the offering is to be made to any person or class of persons other than the underwriters, with a specification of any such person or class; the basis upon which the offering is to be made if otherwise than for cash; the maximum amount of commission or other form of remuneration to be paid in cash or otherwise, directly or indirectly, for or in connection with the sale or offering for sale of such securities; the estimated aggregate underwriting and selling discounts or commissions and finders’ fees, including separately cash, securities, contracts, or anything else of value to accrue to the underwriters or finders in connection with the offering, or, if the selling discounts or commissions are variable, the basis of determining them and their maximum and minimum amounts; the estimated amounts of other selling expenses, including legal, engineering, and accounting charges and a statement as to what person, corporation, or limited liability company shall be responsible for payment of the same; the name and address of every underwriter and every recipient of a finder’s fee; a copy of any underwriting or selling-group agreement pursuant to which the distribution is to be made, or the proposed form of any such agreement whose terms have not yet been determined; and a description of the plan of distribution of any securities which are to be offered otherwise than through an underwriter.

The estimated cash proceeds to be received by the issuer from the offering; the purposes for which the proceeds are to be used by the issuer; the amount to be used for each purpose; the amounts of any funds to be raised from other sources to achieve the purposes stated; the sources of any such funds; and, if any part of the proceeds is to be used to acquire any property, including goodwill, otherwise than in the ordinary course of business, the names and addresses of the vendors, the purchase price, the names of any persons who have received commissions in connection with the acquisition, and the amounts of any such commissions and any other expense in connection with the acquisition.

A description of each and every stock option or other security option outstanding, or to be created in connection with the offering, including the price at which such options may be exercised together with the amount of any such options held or to be held by every person.

The capitalization and long-term debt of the issuer and any subsidiary, including a description of each security outstanding or being registered or otherwise offered, and a statement of the amount and kind of consideration for which the issuer or any subsidiary has issued any of its securities within the past two years or is obligated to issue any of its securities.

The dates of, parties to, and general effect concisely stated of, every management or other material contract made or to be made otherwise than in the ordinary course of business if it is to be performed in whole or in part at or after the filing of the application for registration or was made within the past two years, together with a copy of every such contract; and a description of any pending litigation or proceeding to which the issuer is a party and which affects its business or assets.

A detailed statement showing the items of cash, property, services, patents, goodwill, and any other consideration for which any securities of the issuer have been within two years or are to be issued in payment.

A copy of any prospectus, pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, or other sales literature intended as of the effective date to be used in connection with the offering.

A specimen or copy of the security being registered; a copy of the issuer’s articles of incorporation and bylaws, as currently in effect; and a copy of any indenture or other instrument covering the security to be registered.

A balance sheet of the issuer as of a date within four months prior to the filing of the application for registration; a profit and loss statement and analysis of surplus for each of the three fiscal years preceding the date of the balance sheet and for any period between the close of the last fiscal year and the date of the balance sheet, or for the period of the issuer’s and any predecessor’s existence if less than three years; and, if any part of the proceeds of the offering is to be applied to the purchase of any business, the same financial statements which would be required if the business were the registrant.

Other states in which it is proposed to offer the securities for sale to the public; other states in which the securities are eligible for sale to the public; states which have refused, by order or otherwise, to render the securities eligible for sale to the public or have revoked or suspended the right to sell the securities, or in which an application for registration has been withdrawn; and, if application has been made to register the securities under the federal Securities Act of 1933, the date upon which the application to register the securities was first filed, and a statement as to whether registration under that Act is effective, and if so, the effective date.

Such additional information as the commissioner requires by rule or order or may subsequently request.

Payment of a filing fee for each security or class of security to be registered as follows:

For an initial filing, one-tenth of one percent of the aggregate amount of each security or class of security to be registered but not more than two thousand five hundred dollars.

In no event may an initial filing fee be less than one hundred fifty dollars for each security or class of security to be registered.

An applicant may increase the aggregate amount of each security or class of security to be registered by filing a notice of the additional aggregate dollar amount to be registered and payment of a filing fee of one-tenth of one percent of the additional aggregate dollar amount but not more than five hundred dollars.

No application shall be deemed to be filed or pending and no securities covered by such application shall be deemed to be registered unless a filing fee has been paid. The filing fee shall be retained even if the filing is withdrawn, denied, suspended, revoked, or abandoned.

For the renewal of the registration of securities for additional periods of one year, there must be paid a renewal fee of one hundred fifty dollars.

If the applicant is not domiciled in this state and is not a corporation or limited liability company organized or authorized to transact business under the laws of this state, a consent to service of process conforming to the requirements of section 10-04-14.

The commissioner may by rule or order require as a part of the application for registration under this section that a prospectus containing any designated part of the information specified in subsection 1 be submitted to the commissioner and the same prospectus must be sent or given to each person to whom a sale or an offer to sell is made. The commissioner may by rule or otherwise permit the omission of any item of information or document from any application for registration. In all cases in which an application is filed to register securities and a registration statement covering the same securities has been filed with the federal securities and exchange commission, a copy of the registration statement so filed must be accepted by the commissioner in lieu of the information specified in subdivisions a through q of subsection 1, except that it must be accompanied by a statement of the amount of such securities to be offered in this state. All of the statements, exhibits, or documents of every kind required under this section must be certified by the applicant or the issuer or any person having knowledge of the facts. An applicant may, with the consent of the commissioner, amend or withdraw an application and any or all statements, exhibits, or documents filed therewith under this section at any time prior to the registration or prior to any offering and sale of the securities sought to be registered or the entry of an order denying the registration of such securities, but in no event may the fee be returned.

Registration under this section is effective for a period of one year.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 8; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0408; S.L. 1959, ch. 110, § 4; 1961, ch. 117, § 6; 1965, ch. 96, § 2; 1979, ch. 151, § 3; 1983, ch. 129, § 3; 1991, ch. 54, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1999, ch. 92, § 7; 2003, ch. 82, § 7; 2005, ch. 97, § 7; 2009, ch. 107, §
4.

10-04-08.1.
Authority of commissioner.

The right to sell securities in this state shall not be granted in any case when it appears to the commissioner that the sale of such securities would work a fraud or deception on purchasers or the public, or that the proposed disposal of the securities is on unfair terms, or if the proposed plan of business of the applicant appears to be unfair, unjust, or inequitable. When the commissioner deems it necessary the commissioner has power, in connection with pending applications and at the expense of the applicant, to require the applicant to furnish additional information, to order appraisals, audits, or other examinations and reports, and, when the applicant is the issuer of the securities, or the proposed sale is to be on behalf of the issuer, to make an investigation of the books, records, property, business, and affairs of such issuer.

Upon compliance with all the provisions of this chapter relating to applications for approval or registration by announcement, coordination, or qualification and the requirements of the commissioner, the commissioner shall either approve or register such securities or if the commissioner is of the opinion that sale of the securities would be contrary to the provisions of this section, the commissioner shall deny the application. The commissioner has power to place such conditions, limitations, and restrictions on any approval or registration as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Registration or approval must be by entry in the register of securities, which entry must show the securities approved or registered and for whom approved or registered, and the conditions, limitations, and restrictions, if any, or shall make proper reference to a formal order of the commissioner on file showing such conditions, limitations, and restrictions. Included among any other reasonable conditions, limitations, and restrictions which the commissioner may deem necessary are the following:

The commissioner may by rule, order, or directive require that any security issued or to be issued to a promoter for a consideration different from the public offering price, or to any person for a consideration other than cash, be deposited in escrow with the commissioner or some other depository satisfactory to the commissioner under an escrow agreement that the owners of such securities shall not be entitled to sell or transfer such securities or to withdraw such securities from escrow until all other stockholders who have paid for their stock in cash shall have been paid a dividend or dividends aggregating not less than six percent of the initial offering price shown to the satisfaction of the commissioner to have been held actually earned on the investment in any common stock as held. In case of dissolution or insolvency during the time such securities are held in escrow, the owners of such securities shall not participate in the assets until after the owners of all other securities have been paid in full.

The commissioner may by rule, order, or directive require that all the proceeds from the sale of the approved or registered security be impounded until the issuer receives a specified amount of funds, which amount shall be determined by the commissioner.

The commissioner may refuse to allow the granting of any stock options to any person, but if such an option is allowed, the commissioner may prescribe that the price at which the option can be exercised shall be increased each year in which it is not exercised in an amount to be determined by the commissioner and that the option shall lapse altogether after a specified period to be set by the commissioner.

If any stock is given for past services or consideration, the commissioner may require that the issuer submit to the commissioner a strict and comprehensive evaluation of such past services or consideration and may limit the amount of stock so given in order that it is commensurate with the value of the past services and in no case shall the commissioner allow stock to be given for future services.

The commissioner may limit the price at which the securities, either of par or no par value, may be sold, and if such securities are quoted by a recognized quotation list, such price shall be limited to an amount not unreasonably in excess of the amount quoted.

The commissioner may by rule, order, or directive limit compensation, and all other expenses paid or incurred, directly or indirectly, in connection with the organization, approval, registration, or sale of securities, to an amount not in excess of compensation paid or expenses incurred in connection with the organization, approval, registration, or sale of similar securities.

If more than one class of stock is issued and one class of stock is issued for the purpose of giving preference as to dividends, the commissioner may require that a greater consideration, commensurate with the value of the dividend preference, be paid per share for such stock.

The commissioner may by rule, order, or directive require that any security approved or registered be sold only on a specified form of subscription or sale contract, and that a signed or conformed copy of each contract be filed with the commissioner or preserved by the corporation, partnership, or limited liability company for any period up to three years specified in the rule, order, or directive.

So long as the approval or registration is effective, the commissioner may by rule or order require the person who filed for approval or registration to file reports, not more often than quarterly, to provide reasonably current information upon the matters contained in the application or registration statement, and to disclose the progress of the offering.

The commissioner has the authority to disapprove an application for approval or registration of any security when it is established that one or more of the promoters are not of good business reputation or character.

The provisions of this section do not apply to a federal covered security.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 110, § 5; 1961, ch. 117, § 7; 1983, ch. 128, § 4; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1999, ch. 92, § 8; 2021, ch. 86, § 5, effective July 1, 2021.

10-04-08.2.
Advertising matter — Regulations.

No circular, prospectus, advertisement, form or market letter, report, document, pamphlet, leaflet, script, or other written or printed matter, or any communication by radio, television, or similar communications media, hereinafter referred to as advertising matter, used in connection with the offer, sale, or rendering investment advice with respect to any security in this state shall be published, circulated, distributed, broadcast, or caused to be published, circulated, distributed, or broadcast in any manner unless and until such advertising matter shall have been filed with the commissioner at least five business days prior to its first publication, circulation, distribution, or broadcast, unless such advertising matter pertains to a security or transaction exempted in section 10-04-05 or 10-04-06, relates to a federal covered security, or is used by a federal covered adviser.

The commissioner may by rule or order and subject to such terms and conditions as may be prescribed therein exempt any advertising matter from the filing requirement imposed under subsection 1 if the commissioner finds that the imposition of the filing requirement is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

The commissioner has the power to disapprove any advertising matter filed pursuant to subsection 1 which the commissioner deems in conflict with the purposes of this chapter.

Nothing in this section or section 10-04-04 shall be construed to prohibit the publication or distribution to the public of a preliminary prospectus, provided that no solicitation is made or order or conditional order accepted prior to registration in this state, and provided also that, unless the preliminary prospectus relates to a federal covered security, the following legend appears on each such prospectus or preliminary prospectus:

A registration statement relating to these securities has been filed but has not yet become effective. Information contained herein is subject to completion or amendment. These securities may not be sold nor may offers to buy be accepted prior to the time the registration statement becomes effective. This prospectus shall not constitute an offer to sell or the solicitation of an offer to buy nor shall there be any sale of these securities in any state in which such offer, solicitation, or sale would be unlawful prior to registration or approval under the securities laws of any such state.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 110, § 6; 1961, ch. 117, § 8; 1977, ch. 83, § 3; 1999, ch. 92, § 9.

10-04-08.3.
Unlawful representations concerning registration or exemption.

Neither the fact that an application for approval under section 10-04-05 or 10-04-06 or registration under section 10-04-07.1, 10-04-07.2, 10-04-08, or 10-04-10 or a notice filing under section 10-04-08.4 has been filed nor the fact that a security or person is effectively approved or registered constitutes a finding by the commissioner that any document filed under this chapter is true, complete, and not misleading. Neither any such fact nor the fact that an exemption or exception is available for a security or a transaction means that the commissioner has passed in any way upon the merits or qualifications of, or recommended or given approval to, any security, transaction, or person.

It is unlawful to make, or cause to be made, to any prospective purchaser, customer, or client any representation inconsistent with subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 83, § 4; 1999, ch. 92, § 10; 2005, ch. 97, § 8; 2021, ch. 86, § 6, effective July 1, 2021.

10-04-08.4.
Federal covered security.

A federal covered security may be offered and sold in this state without registration, subject to the following:

Any federal covered security that is subject to section 18(b)(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, may be offered and sold upon the electronic filing of:

A copy of the issuer’s registration statement or a notice of intent for an indefinite or definite dollar amount for each security or class of security on a form prescribed by the commissioner.

A unit investment trust may file an initial notice filing for a definite dollar amount or an indefinite dollar amount. At the time of the initial notice filing for a definite dollar amount, the issuer shall pay a filing fee of one-tenth of one percent of the first seven hundred fifty thousand dollars and one-twentieth of one percent of any amount in excess of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars of the aggregate offering price of each security or class of security. In no event, however, may such filing fee be less than one hundred twenty-five dollars for each security or class of security.

An investment company or unit investment trust may file an initial notice filing for an indefinite dollar amount and pay a filing fee of four hundred dollars for each security or class of security.

A notice filing for a definite dollar amount may be increased before the expiration date on the certificate of effectiveness at the same reduced fee, which must be calculated as provided in subdivision b as a separate fee for each additional amount.

A notice filing for a definite dollar amount may be renewed for additional periods of one year by filing, at least fifteen days prior to its expiration, a renewal and sales report notice with a fee of one hundred dollars to renew the unsold balance.

A notice filing for an indefinite dollar amount may be renewed by filing, within sixty days following the issuer’s fiscal year, a renewal and sales report notice with a fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars.

A notice filing may be terminated by the issuer upon providing the commissioner a notice of such termination.

The provision for each security or class of security in this subsection is effective when the federal registration statement becomes effective with the securities and exchange commission or the date the notice of intent is received by the commissioner, whichever is later. A filing notice for a definite dollar amount is effective for a period of eighteen months from the date of effectiveness.

A copy of any document filed with the securities and exchange commission as the commissioner may require.

Any federal covered security that is subject to section 18(b)(4)(D) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, may be offered and sold under the following conditions:

A notice of intent is filed electronically on SEC form D with a consent to service of process and a nonrefundable filing fee of one hundred dollars within fifteen calendar days after the first sale in this state.

A copy of any document filed with the securities and exchange commission is provided, as the commissioner may require.

The notice filing is effective for a period of one year from the date the filing is received by the commissioner.

The filing fee shall be two hundred fifty dollars in the event the filing is not made within the time period specified in subdivision a.

An issuer conducting an offering under this subsection may renew the offering for an additional period of twelve months by electronically filing SEC form D marked “renewal” and payment of the renewal filing fee of one hundred dollars. The renewal filing fee is two hundred fifty dollars if the filing is made after the expiration date of the current notice filing.

No security may be offered or sold under this subsection, except through or by a broker-dealer and agent registered in accordance with section 10-04-10, unless it is offered and sold through an officer, director, governor, or partner of the issuer and no commission or other remuneration is paid, either directly or indirectly.

The commissioner, by rule or otherwise, may require the filing of a notice or any document filed with the securities and exchange commission under the Securities Act of 1933 with respect to a federal covered security under section 18(b)(3) or 18(b)(4) of the Securities Act of 1933, together with a filing fee.

The following provisions apply to offerings made under tier 2 of federal Regulation A and section 18(b)(3) of the Securities Act of 1933 [15 U.S.C. 77r(b)(3)]:

An issuer planning to offer and sell securities in this state in an offering exempt under tier 2 of federal Regulation A shall submit electronically the following at least twenty-one calendar days before the initial sale in this state:

A completed uniform notice filing of regulation A - tier 2 offering form;

A copy of any document filed with the securities and exchange commission, as the commissioner may require; and

A filing fee of five hundred dollars.

The initial notice filing is effective for twelve months from the date of the filing with this state.

An issuer may increase the amount of securities offered in this state by submitting electronically a uniform notice filing of regulation A - tier 2 offering form marked “amendment”.

An issuer conducting an offering under this subsection may renew the offering for an additional period of twelve months by electronically filing a uniform notice filing of regulation A - tier 2 offering form marked “renewal” and payment of the renewal filing fee of one hundred dollars.

A security may not be offered or sold under this subsection, except through or by a broker-dealer and agent registered in accordance with section 10-04-10, unless the security is offered and sold through an officer, director, governor, or partner of the issuer and no commission or other remuneration is paid, either directly or indirectly.

The following provisions apply to offerings made under federal Regulation Crowdfunding [17 CFR 227] and sections 4(a)(6) and 18(b)(4)(C) of the Securities Act of 1933 [15 U.S.C. 77d(a)(b) and 15 U.S.C. 77r(b)(4)(C)]:

An issuer that offers and sells securities in this state in an offering exempt under federal Regulation Crowdfunding [17 CFR 227], and that either has the issuer’s principal place of business in this state or sells fifty percent or greater of the aggregate amount of the offering to residents of this state, shall file electronically the following with the commissioner:

A completed uniform notice of federal crowdfunding offering form;

A copy of any document filed with the securities and exchange commission, as the commissioner may require; and

A filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars.

If the issuer has the issuer’s principal place of business in this state, the filing required under this subsection must be filed with the commissioner when the issuer makes its initial form C filing concerning the offering with the securities and exchange commission. If the issuer does not have the issuer’s principal place of business in this state but residents of this state have purchased fifty percent or greater of the aggregate amount of the offering, the filing required under this subsection must be filed when the issuer becomes aware that such purchases have met this threshold and in no event later than thirty days from the date of completion of the offering. The initial notice filing is effective for twelve months from the date of the filing with this state.

An issuer conducting an offering under this subsection may renew the offering for an additional period of twelve months by electronically filing the uniform notice of federal crowdfunding offering form marked “renewal” and payment of the renewal filing fee of one hundred dollars.

A security may not be offered or sold under this subsection, except through or by a broker-dealer and agent registered in accordance with section 10-04-10, unless the security is offered and sold through an officer, director, governor, or partner of the issuer and no commission or other remuneration is paid, either directly or indirectly.

The commissioner may issue a stop order suspending the offer and sale of a federal covered security, except a federal covered security under section 18(b)(1) of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, if it is found to be in the public interest or there is a failure to comply with any of the provisions stated in this section.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 92, § 11; 2001, ch. 109, § 7; 2005, ch. 97, § 9; 2009, ch. 107, § 5; 2019, ch. 888, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 86, § 7, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

The Securities Act of 1933 referenced above is compiled at 15 USCS § 77a et seq.